Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 47
PROTECTION OF DEPOSITS OF PUBLIC MONEYS

Section

11-47-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Savings and Loan Association Public Deposit Protection Act".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 399, § 1, effective July 1.

11-47-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that the purpose of this article is to provide protection of public moneys on deposit in state-chartered and federally chartered savings and loan associations in this state above and beyond the protection provided by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor and to ensure prompt payment of deposit liabilities to governmental units in the event of default or insolvency of any such association.

The general assembly further declares that the inclusion of self-insurance pools formed by governmental units within the scope of the provisions of this article is to clarify that such self-insurance pools have been and shall continue to be entitled to protection as provided by the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 399, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 428, § 6, effective April 20.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 141, § 28, effective July 1.

11-47-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Affected governmental unit" means any governmental unit whose deposits of public moneys are affected by an event of default.

"Capital funds" means, with respect to any eligible public depository, the aggregate sum of its capital stock, surplus, and undivided profits and of all reserves required by any law or regulation, together with the amount of any debt subordinated to deposit liabilities when such debt has been allowed to be included in its stated capital position by the applicable regulatory authority.

"Commissioner" means the state commissioner of financial services.

"Defaulting depository" means an eligible public depository to which an event of default has occurred.

"Eligible collateral" means:

Obligations of the United States or of any agency thereof;

Obligations wholly or partially guaranteed or insured as to payment of principal by the United States or any agency thereof;

Obligations of the state of Colorado, including anticipation warrants, and general obligations of any governmental unit of this state, including obligations the interest and principal of which are secured by deposit in escrow of an amount of obligations of the United States or any agency thereof sufficient to secure such payment;

Obligations evidenced by notes secured by first lien mortgages or deeds of trust on real property, whether or not situate in this state, if such obligations are not for construction or land acquisition and development and if such obligations shall not exceed one hundred percent of the value of all eligible collateral on pledge, which obligations shall not be in default in any respect and are wholly owned by the eligible depository;

Revenue bonds, except industrial development revenue bonds, issued by the state of Colorado or any agency thereof, or by any county, city and county, municipality, school district, special district, or other authority within this state, as well as special improvement district bonds issued by any such political subdivision or authority;

Mortgage-backed securities issued by the federal home loan mortgage corporation, the federal national mortgage association, or the government national mortgage association and such other mortgage-backed securities as are approved by the commissioner;

Such liquid assets, as such term is defined in the federal regulations governing members of a federal home loan bank, as are approved by the commissioner;

Irrevocable and unconditional standby letters of credit issued by a federal home loan bank if:

The letter of credit is in the standard format approved by the Colorado division of financial services;

The Colorado division of financial services is designated as the beneficiary of the letter of credit; and

Securities issued by the federal home loan bank remain triple A-rated by one or more nationally recognized organizations which regularly rate such obligations.

"Eligible public depository" means any state-chartered savings and loan association or any federally chartered savings and loan association having an office in this state which is authorized by the laws of the United States to accept deposit accounts, which deposits are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, and which depository has been designated as an eligible public depository by the commissioner.

"Event of default" means the issuance of an order by a supervisory authority or a receiver restraining an eligible public depository from making payments of its deposit liabilities.

"Governmental unit" means the state of Colorado, every municipality, city and county, county, school district, special district, and authority located in this state, every public body corporate created or established under the constitution or any law of this state, and every board, commission, department, institution, agency of, and every entity created by intergovernmental agreement among, any of the foregoing which collects, receives, or has custody of or control over public moneys.

(8.5) (a) "Market value" means, for eligible collateral consisting of obligations wholly or partially guaranteed or insured as to payment of principal by the United States or any agency thereof, or other obligations evidenced by notes secured by first lien mortgages or deeds of trust, the lower of current market quotation or seventy-five percent of the unpaid principal of the note evidencing the obligation.

For all other eligible collateral, "market value" means the current market quotation.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 141, § 29, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Net deposit liability" means, with respect to a defaulting depository, the amount of its deposit liability to a governmental unit after deduction of any applicable federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor insurance with respect thereto.

"Public deposits" means and includes all public moneys on deposit in an eligible public depository, whether payable on demand or at a certain time.

"Public moneys" means all moneys under the control of or in the custody of governmental units.

"Valuation date" means the last business day of either March or September of each year, as the occasion may require.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 399, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 76:

(9) amended, p. 300, § 22, effective May 20.

L. 77:

(5)(d) and (5)(e) amended, p. 574, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 79:

(5)(b) and (5)(d) amended and (8.5) added, p. 1614, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 81:

(5)(d) amended, p. 620, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 83:

(8.5)(a) amended, p. 487, § 2, effective May 10.

L. 85:

(5)(d) and (5)(e) amended and (5)(f) and (5)(g) added, p. 401, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 88:

(8) amended, p. 429, § 7, effective April 20.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 621, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(6) amended, p. 68, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(5)(h) added, p. 159, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2004:

(9) and (10) amended, p. 141, § 29, effective July 1.

11-47-104. Administration - powers of commissioner and financial services board.

The provisions of this article shall be administered by the commissioner under the supervision of the financial services board. The financial services board and the commissioner shall have the authority to do all acts necessary and required to carry out the purpose of this article. To this end, the financial services board is empowered to make, amend, and rescind rules and regulations consistent with said provisions and to prescribe a standard form for the statements and reports required to be made or filed by eligible public depositories and to require uniform use of the same. Acts of the commissioner are subject to appeal to the financial services board pursuant to section 11-44-101.8.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 401, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1453, § 14, effective June 6.

11-47-105. Acceptance of provisions - designation as eligible public depository.

Every state-chartered savings and loan association and every federally chartered savings and loan association having an office in this state that is otherwise eligible to be an eligible public depository and that desires to accept and hold public deposits in an amount in excess of the amount insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor shall file with the commissioner, on a form provided by him or her for such purpose, a statement signed and sworn to by an executive officer of such association electing to accept and become subject to the provisions of this article and setting forth the amount of its capital funds and the aggregate amount and nature of all public deposits held by it. Upon the filing of such statement and acceptance, the commissioner shall forthwith designate such savings and loan association as an eligible public depository and shall issue an appropriate certificate evidencing such designation.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 141, § 30, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 401, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 68, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 141, § 30, effective July 1.

11-47-106. Minimum amount of eligible collateral required to be maintained as security for public deposits. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 401, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1453, § 15, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 142, § 31, effective July 1.

11-47-107. Eligible collateral - when required to be maintained. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 402, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 142, § 32, effective July 1.

11-47-108. Method of securing public deposits.

Except as provided in section 11-47-112 (6)(a), any eligible public depository shall secure public deposits accepted and held by it by pledging eligible collateral having a market value, at all times, equal to at least one hundred percent of the aggregate of said deposits not insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor.

The eligible collateral pledged shall be held as specified in section 11-47-109; except that the depository shall be required to furnish each governmental unit whose deposit is so secured with a statement, signed under oath by an executive officer of said depository, certifying to said governmental unit that its deposit is secured in the manner specified in subsection (1) of this section and specifying where the collateral pledged is being held in custody.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 402, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 469, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 143, § 33, effective July 1.

11-47-109. Where collateral held - right of substitution - income derived.

The eligible collateral required to be pledged as provided in section 11-47-108 shall be held in escrow by another savings and loan association in Colorado, by a state or national bank in Colorado, or by any federal home loan bank or branch thereof or any federal reserve bank or branch thereof approved by the commissioner, and held in such manner as the financial services board shall prescribe by rule. All collateral so held shall be clearly identified as being security maintained or pledged for the aggregate amount of public deposits accepted and held on deposit by said eligible public depository.

Said depository shall have the right at any time to make substitutions of eligible collateral maintained or pledged and shall at all times be entitled to collect and retain all income derived from the same without restriction.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 403, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 574, § 2, effective June 10.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 603, § 1, effective March 10.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 613, § 9, effective April 19.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1454, § 16, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 143, § 34, effective July 1.

11-47-110. Subsequent elections upon approval of commissioner. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 403, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 143, § 35, effective July 1.

11-47-111. Reports required - when filed - contents.

On a date specified by the commissioner, every eligible public depository shall file a report with the commissioner that contains such information as required by the commissioner. The commissioner may require more frequent reports from eligible public depositories.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 403, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 488, § 3, effective May 10.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 69, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 156, § 3, effective August 2.

11-47-112. Power and authority of financial services board.

The commissioner shall have specific power and authority to require any eligible public depository to furnish, at any time, such information as the commissioner may request or demand concerning the amount of public deposits held by it, the portion thereof that is insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, the amount of its capital funds, and the nature, amount, market value, and location of the eligible collateral maintained or pledged by it to secure said deposits.

If any such depository shall fail or refuse to furnish the information requested or demanded within ten days after the date of the request or demand, the commissioner shall have the authority to forthwith deny it the right to accept and hold any additional public deposits until such time as said information is furnished to him and he has acknowledged receipt thereof, and, at his discretion, he may make public announcement of such denial.

The commissioner shall have the authority to determine and fix the date upon which any event of default is deemed to have occurred, after taking into account and giving due consideration to any rule, regulation, or lawful order of any supervisory authority as the same may affect the inability or failure of an eligible public depository to repay deposit liabilities.

The commissioner shall have the authority to require any eligible public depository to substitute new eligible collateral for any of its maintained or pledged collateral which he deems to be ineligible.

If any depository violates any regulation promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to section 11-47-104 or violates any provision of this article, the commissioner shall have the authority to deny, forthwith, the right of said depository to accept and hold any additional public deposits until such time as the depository complies with the regulations or the provisions of this article. The commissioner, at his discretion, may make public announcement of such denial.

The financial services board may promulgate rules to require an eligible public depository to reduce or eliminate its uninsured public deposit liability if said depository's regulatory capital does not comply with the minimum requirement of the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor. Notwithstanding any other provision in this article to the contrary, the financial services board also may promulgate rules to require a depository to pledge eligible collateral having a market value in excess of one hundred percent of the aggregate amount of public deposits not insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, if said depository's regulatory capital does not comply with the minimum requirement of the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor. Notwithstanding any other provision in this article to the contrary, the financial services board may promulgate rules to require an eligible public depository to pledge a minimum amount of eligible collateral.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 403, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(4) added, p. 402, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 87:

(5) and (6) added, p. 469, § 3, effective May 1.

L. 89:

(6)(a) amended and (6)(b) repealed, pp. 614, 615, §§ 10, 13, effective April 19.

L. 93:

(6) amended, p. 1454, § 17, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

(1) and (6)(a) amended, pp. 152, 144, §§ 63, 36, effective July 1.

11-47-113. Procedure when event of default occurs.

When the commissioner has determined that an event of default has occurred with respect to any eligible public depository and has determined and fixed the date of such occurrence, he or she shall proceed in the following manner:

He shall forthwith seize and take possession of all eligible collateral, maintained or pledged, belonging to the defaulting depository, wherever held in custody.

Within twenty days after seizing and taking possession of all eligible collateral pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the commissioner shall ascertain the aggregate amount of public deposits held by the defaulting depository, as disclosed by the records of such depository, and the portion thereof that is insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, and shall notify each affected governmental unit of the amount of its deposit, as so disclosed, and the portion thereof that is so insured, and shall require each affected governmental unit to provide him or her with a verified statement showing the amount of its deposit, as disclosed by its own records, within thirty days after receipt of such notification.

Upon receipt of all verified statements from an affected governmental unit, he shall determine and fix the net deposit liability of the defaulting depository to such affected governmental unit. Upon receipt of all such verified statements from all affected governmental units, he shall determine and fix the aggregate net deposit liability of the defaulting depository to all affected governmental units.

The commissioner shall proceed to liquidate the eligible collateral maintained or pledged by the defaulting depository which he had theretofore seized and may, from time to time, apply the amount realized from such liquidation against the net deposit liability to any governmental unit. The commissioner shall maintain a reserve from such amount realized for the payment of the aggregate net deposit liability to all affected governmental units until payment is made to all affected governmental units.

In the event the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor is appointed and acts as liquidator or receiver of any eligible public depository under state or federal law, those duties specified in this section to be performed by the commissioner may, where the commissioner deems appropriate, be delegated by the commissioner to and performed by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 404, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(e) amended, p. 469, § 4, effective May 1.

L. 89:

(1)(b) to (1)(d) amended, p. 614, § 11, effective April 19.

L. 2004:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (1)(e) amended, p. 144, § 37, effective July 1.

11-47-114. Assessments made - exceptions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 404, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 145, § 38, effective July 1.

11-47-115. When assessments payable - procedure if not paid. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 405, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 145, § 39, effective July 1.

11-47-116. Disposition of assessments - subrogation of claims - expenses. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 405, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 145, § 40, effective July 1.

11-47-117. No impairment of obligations. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 405, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 146, § 41, effective July 1.

11-47-118. Public moneys to be deposited only in eligible public depositories - penalty for violation.

It shall be unlawful for any public moneys to be deposited in any state-chartered savings and loan association, or in any federally chartered savings and loan association having its principal office in this state, other than one that has been designated by the commissioner as an eligible public depository, unless the entire amount of such deposit is insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor.

Any official of a governmental unit having custody of or control over public moneys who violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, which fine shall be mandatory, and, upon any such conviction, the court may adjudge that he be removed from office.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, nothing shall be construed to prevent a savings and loan association which is an eligible public depository operating pursuant to the provisions of this article from being or acting as an agent in behalf of any public entity for the purposes of making investments as authorized by part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Any such savings and loan association shall maintain such accounting records as are necessary to readily distinguish between the activities authorized by said part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., and the purposes of the public deposit protection requirements imposed upon it as a condition of being an eligible public depository. The financial services board may promulgate such rules and regulations as it deems desirable to ensure that the activities authorized under part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., and the protection of public funds pursuant to this article are not commingled.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 406, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(3) added, p. 615, § 12, effective April 19.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1454, § 18, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 146, § 42, effective July 1.

11-47-119. Liability of officials of governmental units.

No official of a governmental unit who acted in good faith in selecting, designating, or approving any eligible public depository for the deposit of public moneys in his custody or under his control shall be liable for any loss of public moneys deposited therein by reason of the occurrence of an event of default with respect to such depository.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 406, § 1, effective July 1.

11-47-120. Authority to accept deposits - acceptance of insured deposits.

Any state-chartered savings and loan association, or any federally chartered savings and loan association having its principal office in this state that is authorized by the laws of this state or of the United States to accept deposit accounts or savings deposits, is authorized to accept and hold, and any governmental unit is authorized to make and maintain in such association, deposits of public moneys as provided in this article. Any such association is authorized to accept and hold, and any governmental unit is authorized to make and maintain therein, deposits of public moneys to the extent that the full amount thereof is insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, even though such association has not elected to be designated as an eligible public depository under the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 406, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 146, § 43, effective July 1.